Hawaii statutes.
§431:15-328 Provisions for third party
claims. (a) Whenever any third party asserts a cause of action against an
insured of an insurer in liquidation, the third party may file a claim with the
liquidator.

(b) Whether or not the third party files a claim,
the insured may file a claim on its own behalf in the liquidation. If the
insured fails to file a claim by the date for filing claims specified in the
order of liquidation or within sixty days after mailing of the notice required
by section 431:15-311, whichever is later, it is an unexcused late filer.

(c) The liquidator shall make recommendations
to the court under section 431:15-332, for the allowance of an insured's claim
under subsection (b) after consideration of the probable outcome of any pending
action against the insured on which the claim is based, the probable damages
recoverable in the action and the probable costs and expenses of defense.
After allowance by the court, the liquidator shall withhold any dividends
payable on the claim, pending the outcome of litigation and negotiation with
the insured. Whenever it seems appropriate, the liquidator shall reconsider
the claim on the basis of additional information and amend the liquidator's
recommendations to the court. The insured shall be afforded the same notice
and opportunity to be heard on all changes in the recommendation as in its
initial determination. The court may amend its allowance as it thinks
appropriate. As claims against the insured are settled or barred, the insured
shall be paid from the amount withheld the same percentage dividend as was paid
on other claims of like property, based on the lesser of:

(1) The amount actually recovered from the insured by
action or paid by agreement plus the reasonable costs and expenses of defense,
or

(2) The amount allowed on the claims by the court.

After all claims are settled or barred, any sum
remaining from the amount withheld shall revert to the undistributed assets of
the insurer. Delay in final payment under this subsection shall not be a
reason for unreasonable delay of final distribution and discharge of the
liquidator.

(d) If several claims founded upon one policy
are filed, whether by third parties or as claims by the insured under this
section, and the aggregate allowed amount of the claims to which the same limit
of liability in the policy is applicable exceeds that limit, each claim as
allowed shall be reduced in the same proportion so that the total equals the
policy limit. Claims by the insured shall be evaluated as in subsection (c).
If any insured's claim is subsequently reduced under subsection (c), the amount
thus freed shall be apportioned ratably among the claims which have been
reduced under this subsection.

(e) No claim may be presented under this
section if it is covered by any guaranty fund or association, or foreign
guaranty association. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next